src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
!  --------------------
!! The 18th century Southern Saami language adjectives compare.

LEXICON ax
ac ;

LEXICON as
+A+Sg+Nom:%>es # ;
+A:as xc_oblique ;

LEXICON ac
+A+Sg+Nom: # ;
+A: xc_oblique ;

!LEXICON av
!+A+Sg+Nom: # ;
!+A:e xv_oblique ;


LEXICON NUOR
+A+Sg+Nom: # ;
+A:e NUOR_oblique ;

LEXICON NUOR_oblique
+Sg+Gen:%>n # ;            ! nuoren
+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%>a # ;     ! nuora
+Sg+Acc:%>b # ;            ! nuoreb
+Sg+Ill:^EA%>i # ;         ! nuorai 
+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:%>i # ;     ! nuori
+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:%>i2 # ;    ! nuorei
+Sg+Ela:%>st # ;           ! nuorest
+Sg+Ela+Use/NG:^EA%>st # ; ! nuorast
+Sg+Ine:%>sne # ;          ! nuoresne
+Sg+Ine+Use/NG:^EA%>n # ;  ! nuoran
+Sg+Ine+Use/NG:%>n # ;     ! nuoren
+Sg+Com:%>in # ;           ! nuorin      
+Sg+Com+Use/NG:^EA%>in # ; ! nuorain
+Sg+Com+Use/NG:%>i2n # ;   ! nuorein     
+Sg+Abe:^EA%>tak # ;       ! nuoratak
+Sg+Abe+Use/NG:^EA%>t # ;  ! nuorat
+Sg+Abe+Use/NG:%>t # ;     ! nuoret
+Sg+Ess:^EA%>n # ;         ! nuoran
+Sg+Ess+Use/NG:%>n # ;     ! nuoren

+Pl+Nom:%>h # ;            ! nuoreh
+Pl+Nom+Use/NG:^EA%>h # ;  ! nuorah
+Pl+Gen:^EA%>i # ;         ! nuorai 
+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:%>i # ;     ! nuori
+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:%>i2 # ;    ! nuorei
+Pl+Ill:^EA%>it # ;        ! nuorait 
+Pl+Ill+Use/NG:%>it # ;    ! nuorit
+Pl+Ill+Use/NG:%>i2t # ;   ! nuoreit
+Pl+Acc:^EA%>it # ;        ! nuorait 
+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>it # ;    ! nuorit
+Pl+Acc+Use/NG:%>i2t # ;   ! nuoreit
+Pl+Ela:%>ist # ;           ! nuorist
+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:^EA%>ist # ; ! nuoraist
+Pl+Ela+Use/NG:%>i2st # ;   ! nuoreist     

+Pl+Ine:%>in # ;           ! nuorin      
+Pl+Ine+Use/NG:^EA%>isne # ; ! nuoraisne
+Pl+Ine+Use/NG:%>i2sne # ;   ! nuoreisne     

+Pl+Com:%>i # ;           ! nuori      
+Pl+Com+Use/NG:^EA%>i # ; ! nuorai
+Pl+Com+Use/NG:%>i2 # ;   ! nuorei

+Pl+Ess:^EA%>in # ;         ! nuorain
+Pl+Ess+Use/NG:^EA%>n # ;   ! nuoran


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
